Tables/Contraction/zh-tw.cti
always \u2ebc 1245-12356-5
always \u3400 245-234-3
always \u3401 124-2345-5
always \u3404 123-35-5
always \u3405 34-4
always \u3406 1456-4
always \u340C 16-2
always \u3416 15-346-2
always \u341C 245-234-2
always \u341F 12345-356-3
always \u3421 1345-25-5
always \u3424 145-1236-3
always \u3428 15-1256-5
always \u3429 15-13456-2
always \u342A 1235-2456-5
always \u342B 15-235-3
always \u342C 14-234-2
always \u342D 14-1456-4
always \u342E 15-46-3
always \u342F 235-3
always \u3430 15-1456-5
always \u3431 1-136-4
always \u3432 145-2456-5
always \u3433 34-5
always \u3434 1234-1236-3
always \u3435 1245-34-2
always \u3436 1235-35-3
always \u3437 134-345-5
always \u3438 245-2345-5
always \u3439 16-5
always \u343A 1-12346-5
always \u343B 1345-356-5
always \u343C 24-1356-3
always \u343D 12345-1356-3
always \u343E 45-2
always \u3440 124-2456-5
always \u3441 1-25-3
always \u3442 12345-1346-4
always \u3443 146-5
always \u3444 34-4
always \u3445 125-25-5
always \u3446 123-1236-4
always \u3447 1-12356-5
always \u3448 145-12346-3
always \u3449 15-34-5
always \u344A 16-5
always \u344B 245-235-5
always \u344C 456-3
always \u344D 14-356-5
always \u344E 1345-146-4
always \u344F 1-34-5
always \u3450 24-34-2
always \u3451 125-1236-2
always \u3453 13-256-5
always \u3454 15-1256-4
always \u3457 24-136-3
always \u3458 13-346-5
always \u3459 145-346-2
always \u345A 1345-25-2
always \u345B 15-34-5
always \u345C 16-5
always \u345D 14-12346-5
always \u345E 13456-5
always \u345F 135-1356-4
always \u3460 24-34-5
always \u3462 13-236-2
always \u3463 14-1236-2
always \u3464 134-246-2
always \u3465 16-5
always \u3466 14-16-5
always \u3467 13-16-5
always \u3468 1235-12356-5
always \u3469 14-25-2
always \u346A 12-2456-2
always \u346B 245-16-4
always \u346D 135-16-4
always \u346E 1235-123456-2
always \u346F 15-1256-4
always \u3470 1235-1246-5
always \u3471 1245-146-4
always \u3472 135-356-5
always \u3473 1-12356-5
always \u3474 245-1456-3
always \u3475 13-16-2
always \u3476 15-16-5
always \u3477 124-2456-5
always \u3478 246-2
always \u3479 1235-1246-5
always \u347A 13-256-5
always \u347B 134-345-5
always \u347C 14-236-5
always \u347D 124-1346-2
always \u347E 246-2
always \u347F 1-146-5
always \u3480 1-2346-2
always \u3481 1256-4
always \u3482 1-25-2
always \u3483 156-5
always \u3484 1245-1236-4
always \u3485 245-16-4
always \u3486 15-16-5
always \u3487 134-34-5
always \u3488 15-2345-5
always \u3489 124-1346-4
always \u348A 15-2346-5
always \u348B 15-156-3
always \u348C 245-235-2
always \u348D 14-356-4
always \u348E 15-345-5
always \u3491 1235-1246-5
always \u3492 1234-34-2
always \u3493 124-345-5
always \u3494 24-34-4
always \u3495 46-3
always \u3496 12356-4
always \u3497 124-2456-2
always \u3499 134-2345-2
always \u349A 123456-4
always \u349B 145-246-5
always \u349C 1256-4
always \u349D 134-346-5
always \u349E 13-256-5
always \u349F 1345-246-4
always \u34A0 15-346-5
always \u34A1 234-2
always \u34A4 12-2346-5
always \u34A5 12345-1356-3
always \u34A6 14-356-4
always \u34A7 14-16-5
always \u34A8 15-2345-3
always \u34A9 14-25-4
always \u34AA 15-16-2
always \u34AB 13-16-5
always \u34AC 456-3
always \u34AD 123-123456-3
always \u34AF 346-5
always \u34B0 245-45-2
always \u34B2 245-2456-2
always \u34B3 14-46-4
always \u34B4 13-34-4
always \u34B5 134-146-5
always \u34B6 13-12346-3
always \u34B7 15-13456-3
always \u34B8 15-1246-5
always \u34B9 145-2345-3
always \u34BA 456-4
always \u34BB 134-146-5
always \u34BC 134-1236-2
always \u34BD 245-45-3
always \u34BE 24-156-5
always \u34BF 14-16-2
always \u34C1 456-4
always \u34C2 123-12356-5
always \u34C3 145-34-5
always \u34C4 12-136-5
always \u34C5 124-13456-3
always \u34C7 25-5
always \u34C8 135-13456-5
always \u34C9 1235-25-5
always \u34CA 145-12346-5
always \u34CB 13-12346-5
always \u34CC 12-1356-3
always \u34CE 245-1456-3
always \u34CF 13-235-4
always \u34D0 14-34-5
always \u34D1 15-13456-5
always \u34D3 1345-1236-2
always \u34D4 15-346-5
always \u34D5 134-346-5
always \u34D6 135-16-5
always \u34D7 13-346-2
always \u34D8 15-34-5
always \u34DA 13-12346-3
always \u34DB 13-12346-3
always \u34DC 234-5
always \u34DD 12-456-5
always \u34DE 245-23456-5
always \u34DF 1234-16-2
always \u34E0 145-2345-5
always \u34E1 12345-12356-4
always \u34E2 14-25-5
always \u34E3 245-23456-5
always \u34E4 245-23456-5
always \u34E5 124-12346-3
always \u34E6 135-126-5
always \u34E7 13-1236-3
always \u34E8 245-156-5
always \u34E9 13-346-2
always \u34EA 14-1346-4
always \u34EC 123-34-3
always \u34ED 24-2346-2
always \u34EE 13-2346-3
always \u34EF 14-16-2
always \u34F0 1235-35-5
always \u34F1 24-34-3
always \u34F2 1234-2345-3
always \u34F3 145-16-3
always \u34F4 1245-12456-4
always \u34F5 2346-5
always \u34F6 245-346-5
always \u34F7 16-5
always \u34F8 1-25-2
always \u34F9 245-1246-5
always \u34FA 13-2345-3
always \u34FB 13-1346-3
always \u34FC 12-156-5
always \u34FD 12-12346-2
always \u34FE 15-16-3
always \u3500 14-46-5
always \u3501 145-1356-3
always \u3502 14-1456-2
always \u3503 15-236-3
always \u3504 15-34-5
always \u3505 15-246-5
always \u3506 125-1236-4
always \u3507 1234-126-3
always \u3509 1-34-2
always \u350A 145-1236-4
always \u350B 13-2345-3
always \u350C 125-12356-5
always \u350D 12-35-3
always \u350E 15-236-3
always \u350F 14-16-5
always \u3510 245-2345-3
always \u3511 12-156-5
always \u3512 15-16-2
always \u3513 13-2345-4
always \u3515 13-16-2
always \u3517 12345-356-5
always \u3518 12-34-5
always \u3519 135-1356-3
always \u351A 123-12356-4
always \u351C 135-126-2
always \u351D 14-46-4
always \u351E 123-2356-3
always \u3520 1235-2346-2
always \u3521 1234-16-5
always \u3522 15-236-3
always \u3523 14-356-5
always \u3524 15-1456-5
always \u3525 1234-16-2
always \u3526 46-4
always \u3527 14-1256-5
always \u3528 135-356-5
always \u3529 2346-5
always \u352A 14-34-4
always \u352C 1-25-2
always \u352D 12-156-2
always \u352E 1345-25-2
always \u352F 15-45-2
always \u3530 1235-1356-2
always \u3531 1256-4
always \u3532 13-1246-4
always \u3533 13-1246-4
always \u3534 16-5
always \u3535 15-45-4
always \u3536 13-1236-4
always \u3537 14-12356-5
always \u3538 124-16-3
always \u3539 14-2346-5
always \u353A 24-156-5
always \u353B 1234-16-3
always \u353C 15-123456-4
always \u353D 234-4
always \u353E 13-346-2
always \u353F 125-12356-5
always \u3540 234-2
always \u3541 245-236-5
always \u3542 1456-2
always \u3543 15-16-3
always \u3544 1-156-4
always \u3545 13-23456-2
always \u3546 1235-34-5
always \u3547 14-345-3
always \u3548 16-4
always \u3549 123-2346-5
always \u354A 12345-34-3
always \u354B 245-1456-2
always \u354C 2456-5
always \u354D 145-1246-3
always \u354E 123-2346-5
always \u354F 12-34-2
always \u3550 15-346-4
always \u3551 12-34-2
always \u3552 1246-2
always \u3553 12-1236-2
always \u3554 124-13456-3
always \u3555 1235-12456-5
always \u3556 15-34-5
always \u3557 234-5
always \u3558 245-1236-3
always \u3559 13-256-5
always \u355A 1-146-4
always \u355B 246-2
always \u355C 24-156-4
always \u355E 24-35-3
always \u355F 123-1246-5
always \u3560 24-456-3
always \u3561 1235-25-5
always \u3562 13-2456-5
always \u3563 2345-4
always \u3564 245-234-2
always \u3565 24-136-3
always \u3566 1235-35-5
always \u3567 15-16-3
always \u3568 12345-1236-5
always \u3569 1234-1346-5
always \u356A 145-1236-4
always \u356B 12345-1346-4
always \u356C 13-12346-3
always \u356D 146-3
always \u356E 12345-34-4
always \u356F 1345-345-5
always \u3570 15-236-5
always \u3571 234-2
always \u3572 1235-35-2
always \u3573 15-235-3
always \u3574 12-136-2
always \u3575 13-25-2
always \u3576 134-126-5
always \u3577 1234-345-3
always \u3578 14-16-5
always \u3579 12345-345-2
always \u357A 1235-146-2
always \u357B 1234-12356-4
always \u357C 15-235-3
always \u357D 15-156-5
always \u3580 14-2346-5
always \u3581 14-1456-5
always \u3582 16-5
always \u3583 1235-12356-4
always \u3584 1-12356-3
always \u3585 15-1256-5
always \u3586 245-1256-2
always \u3587 156-2
always \u3588 14-146-4
always \u3589 245-16-4
always \u358A 15-256-2
always \u358F 1345-346-5
always \u3590 1246-4
always \u3591 15-346-5
always \u3592 124-16-2
always \u3593 1235-12346-2
always \u3594 124-123456-4
always \u3595 1345-346-5
always \u3596 1345-346-5
always \u3597 1456-2
always \u3598 1-136-3
always \u359E 2356-3
always \u359F 24-12356-5
always \u35A0 1345-345-4
always \u35A1 346-5
always \u35A2 245-156-2
always \u35A3 1234-12356-4
always \u35A4 1235-1236-2
always \u35A5 13-256-5
always \u35A6 145-12346-4
always \u35A7 123456-4
always \u35A8 14-34-5
always \u35A9 15-12356-4
always \u35AA 1256-5
always \u35AB 14-13456-2
always \u35AD 124-2345-4
always \u35AE 14-123456-2
always \u35B4 123456-4
always \u35B5 13-1256-5
always \u35B6 1456-3
always \u35B7 24-156-2
always \u35B8 15-236-3
always \u35B9 1234-136-2
always \u35BA 12-123456-4
always \u35BB 1245-12356-2
always \u35BC 145-25-4
always \u35BD 125-2346-2
always \u35BE 2346-5
always \u35BF 346-2
always \u35C0 234-3
always \u35C1 2346-5
always \u35C2 24-1356-4
always \u35C3 123456-4
always \u35C4 134-1236-5
always \u35C5 1235-34-2
always \u35C6 13-2346-2
always \u35C7 15-23456-3
always \u35C8 134-1236-2
always \u35C9 14-236-5
always \u35CA 13-16-2
always \u35CB 1235-12356-2
always \u35CC 1-156-5
always \u35CD 1-2456-3
always \u35CE 13-23456-5
always \u35CF 2356-3
always \u35D0 123-2346-5
always \u35D1 135-2456-1
always \u35D2 2456-5
always \u35D3 1-1246-3
always \u35D4 245-2345-3
always \u35D5 13-12356-5
always \u35D6 145-1236-5
always \u35D7 135-16-4
always \u35D8 135-126-2
always \u35D9 12-34-2
always \u35DA 14-16-5
always \u35DB 15-246-5
always \u35DC 15-234-5
always \u35DE 1234-126-5
always \u35E2 1235-12346-2
always \u35E3 124-16-5
always \u35E4 245-16-3
always \u35E5 123-25-5
always \u35E6 14-146-2
always \u35E7 1-156-5
always \u35E8 2456-4
always \u35E9 15-16-3
always \u35EA 1234-16-3
always \u35EB 245-346-5
always \u35EC 12-345-3
always \u35ED 15-16-3
always \u35F0 245-12346-2
always \u35F1 13-16-2
always \u35F2 1235-35-5
always \u35F3 145-345-3
always \u35F4 2345-2
always \u35F5 15-1256-5
always \u35F6 1234-126-3
always \u35F7 15-2456-3
always \u35FA 15-345-5
always \u35FB 13-25-3
always \u35FC 346-5
always \u35FD 15-46-4
always \u35FE 15-236-3
always \u35FF 1235-2346-4
always \u3600 125-25-5
always \u3601 16-5
always \u3602 245-156-2
always \u3603 1345-25-5
always \u3604 14-1356-3
always \u3605 15-2345-2
always \u3606 124-2456-2
always \u3607 1245-12346-2
always \u3608 1345-16-4
always \u3609 13-346-2
always \u360A 16-5
always \u360B 15-2345-2
always \u360C 13-1256-5
always \u360D 13-16-2
always \u360E 1235-1236-4
always \u3610 1234-146-5
always \u3611 14-16-5
always \u3613 14-1236-2
always \u3614 15-2456-3
always \u3615 1235-1236-4
always \u3616 2345-2
always \u3617 245-1256-3
always \u3619 2345-2
always \u361A 1235-1236-4
always \u361B 123-1236-3
always \u361C 12-12356-2
always \u361D 1345-16-5
always \u361E 1235-25-5
always \u361F 12-456-3
always \u3620 135-16-3
always \u3621 15-23456-2
always \u3622 12346-4
always \u3623 15-45-3
always \u3624 12456-3
always \u3625 2346-2
always \u3626 245-1456-2
always \u3627 15-1256-5
always \u3628 1345-346-5
always \u3629 135-16-5
always \u362A 1235-146-5
always \u362B 13-13456-5
always \u362C 146-3
always \u362D 146-3
always \u362F 12-1346-4
always \u3630 1-136-3
always \u3631 124-1236-3
always \u3632 13-1256-2
always \u3633 245-234-3
always \u3634 125-25-5
always \u3635 135-34-5
always \u3636 13-346-2
always \u3637 2456-5
always \u3638 125-1346-5
always \u3639 245-156-2
always \u363A 12345-345-2
always \u363B 1456-3
always \u363D 1-156-5
always \u363F 1345-346-5
always \u3640 14-234-5
always \u3641 134-356-2
always \u3642 145-1246-5
always \u3643 135-1346-3
always \u3644 135-16-5
always \u3645 135-146-4
always \u3647 12-34-5
always \u3648 15-23456-5
always \u3649 124-2345-4
always \u364A 1-1346-5
always \u364B 245-16-2
always \u364C 15-34-5
always \u364D 145-25-3
always \u364E 1246-3
always \u364F 12345-34-5
always \u3650 145-25-4
always \u3651 1256-4
always \u3652 346-4
always \u3653 123-1246-2
always \u3654 1235-1236-2
always \u3655 123-2356-5
always \u3657 1246-3
